Hawaii statutes.
[§624D-2] Definitions. In this chapter:

"Foreign jurisdiction" means a state
other than this State.

"Foreign subpoena" means a subpoena
issued under authority of a court of record of a foreign jurisdiction.

"Person" means an individual,
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or
governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.

"State" means a state of the United
States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular
possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

"Subpoena" means a document, however
denominated, issued under authority of a court of record requiring a person to:

(1) Attend and give testimony at a deposition;

(2) Produce and permit inspection and copying of
designated books, documents, records, electronically stored information, or
tangible things in the possession, custody, or control of the person; or

(3) Permit inspection of premises under the control
of the person. [L 2012, c 17, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next